Texas, session 892, HB44.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 25.0092, Government Code, is amended by amending Subsections (a) and (d) and adding Subsection (c-1) to read as follows: (a)  In addition to the jurisdiction provided by Section 25.0003 and other law, and except as limited by Subsection (b), a county court at law in Atascosa County has concurrent jurisdiction with the district court in: (1)  Class A and Class B misdemeanor cases; (2)  family law matters; (3)  juvenile matters; (4)  probate matters; [and] (5)  appeals from the justice and municipal courts; and (6)  civil cases in which the matter in controversy exceeds the maximum amount provided by Section 25.0003 but does not exceed $1 million, excluding interest, statutory or punitive damages and penalties, and attorney's fees and costs, as alleged on the face of the petition, including: (A)  a suit to decide the issue of title to real or personal property; (B)  a suit for the enforcement of a lien on real property; (C)  a suit for the trial of the right to property valued at $500 or more that has been levied on under a writ of execution, sequestration, or attachment; and (D)  a suit for the recovery of real property. (c-1)  In addition to other assignments provided by law, a judge of the county court at law in Atascosa County is subject to assignment under Chapter 74 to any district court in Atascosa County.  A county court at law judge assigned to a district court may hear any matter pending in the district court. (d)  The judge of a county court at law shall be paid as provided by Section 25.0005 [a total annual salary set by the commissioners court at an amount that is not less than $1,000 less than the total annual salary received by a district judge in the county.  A district judge's or statutory county court judge's total annual salary does not include contributions and supplements paid by a county]. SECTION 2.  Section 25.0092(a), Government Code, as amended by this Act, applies only to a case filed or proceeding commenced on or after the effective date of this Act. A case filed or proceeding commenced before that date is governed by the law in effect on the date the case was filed or the proceeding was commenced, and the former law is continued in effect for that purpose. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.